Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4206
Plan for triage and transfer of acute stroke patients.

Beginning on January 1, 2017, a hospital that does not have certification described under section 71-4204 shall have a predetermined plan for the triage and transfer of acute stroke patients and shall file the plan annually with the department.

Laws 2016, LB722, § 6.